Hawaii statutes.
[§163D-8.5 Approval of projects, plans, and
programs.] All agricultural projects, agricultural development plans, and
project facility programs developed by the corporation must be approved by the
board of agriculture before implementation. [L 1994, c 264, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next